en: E481, Sodium stearoyl-2-lactylate, Sodium stearoyl lactylate
xx: E481
bg: E481, Натриев стераоил-2-лактилат, Натриев стеароил лактилат
ca: E481, Estearoïl-2-lactilat de sodi, estearoïl-2-lactilat sòdic
cs: E481, Stearoyl-2-mléčnan sodný, Stearoyllaktylát sodný
da: E481, Natriumstearoyllactylat, Natriumstearoyllactylat
de: E481, Natriumstearoyl-2-lactylat, Natriumstearoyllaktylat, Natriumstearoyllactylat
el: E481, Στεατοϋλο-2-γαλακτυλικο νατριο, Στεατοϋλογαλακτυλικό νάτριο
eo: E481, Natria stearoila laktilato
es: E481, Estearoil-2-lactilato de sodio, estearoil-2-lactilato sódico, Estearoil-lactilato de sodio, Sodio estearoil lactato, sodio estearoil lactilato
et: E481, Naatriumstearoüül-2-laktülaat, Naatriumstearoüüllaktülaat
fi: E481, Natriumstearoyyli-2-laktylaatti, Natriumstearoyylilaktylaatti, Natriumstearoyyli-2-laktylaattia, Natriumstearoyylilaktylaattia
fr: E481, Stéaroyl-2-lactylate de sodium, Stéaryl de sodium lactylé, Oléyl de sodium lactylé, Stéaroyllactylate de sodium
ga: E481, lachtaláit stéiril sóidiam
hr: E481, natrijev stearoil-2-laktilat
hu: E481, Nátrium-sztearoil-2-laktilát, Nátrium-sztearoil-laktilát
it: E481, Stearoil-2-lattilato di sodio, Stearoil-lattilato di sodio
ja: E481, ステアロイル乳酸ナトリウム, ステアロイル乳酸Na, ステアロイル乳酸Ｎａ, ステアリル乳酸ナトリウム, ステアリル乳酸Na, ステアリル乳酸Ｎａ
lt: E481, Natrio stearoil-2-laktilatas, Natrio stearoil-laktilatas
lv: E481, Nātrija stearoil-2-laktilāts, Nātrija stearoillaktilāts
mt: E481, Stearojl-2-lattilat tas-sodju, Lattilat stearojliku tas-sodju
nl: E481, Natriumstearoyl-2-lactylaat, Natriumstearoyllactylaat
pl: E481, Stearoilomleczan sodu, 2-stearoilomleczan sodu
pt: E481, Estearoíl-2-lactilato de sódio, Estearoíl-lactilato de sódio
ro: E481, Stearoil-2-lactilat de sodiu, Stearoil lactilat de sodiu
sh: E481, Natrijum stearoil laktilat
sk: E481, Stearoyl-2-laktylát sodný, Stearoyllaktylát sodný
sl: E481, Natrijev stearoil-2-laktilat, natrijev stearoil laktilat
sr: E481, Natrijum stearoil laktilat
sv: E481, Natriumstearoyl-2-laktylat, Natriumstearoyllaktylat

en: E481(i)
xx: E481(i)

en: E481(ii), Sodium oleyl lactylate
xx: E481(ii)

en: E482, Calcium stearoyl-2-lactylate
xx: E482
bg: E482, Калциев стераоил-2-лактилат
ca: E482, Estearoïl-2-lactilat de calci
cs: E482, Stearoyl-2-mléčnan vápenatý
da: E482, Calciumstearoyllactylat
de: E482, Calciumstearoyl-2-lactylat
el: E482, Στεατοϋλο-2-γαλακτυλικο ασβεστιο
es: E482, Estearoil-2-lactilato de calcio, Calcio estearoil 2-lactilato, calcio estearoil lactilato
et: E482, Kaltsiumstearoüül-2-laktülaat
fi: E482, Kalsiumstearoyyli-2-laktylaatti, Kalsiumstearoyyli-2-laktylaattia
fr: E482, Stéaroyl-2-lactylate de calcium, Stéaryl de calcium lactylé, Oléyl de calcium lactylé
hu: E482, Kalcium-sztearoil-2-laktilát
it: E482, Stearoil-2-lattilato di calcio
lt: E482, Kalcio stearoil-2-laktilatas
lv: E482, Kalcija stearoil-2-laktilāts
mt: E482, Lattilat stearojliku-2 tal-kalċju
nl: E482, Calciumstearoyl-2-lactylaat
pl: E482, Stearoilomleczan wapnia
pt: E482, Estearoíl-2-lactilato de cálcio
ro: E482, Stearoil-2-lactilat de calciu
sk: E482, Stearoyl-2-laktylát vápenatý
sl: E482, Kalcijev stearoil-2-laktilat
sv: E482, Kalciumstearoyl-2-laktylat

en: E482(i), Calcium stearoyl lactylate
xx: E482(i)

en: E482(ii), Calcium oleyl lactylate
xx: E482(ii)

en: E483, Stearyl tartrate, Stearyl palmityl tartrate
xx: E483
bg: E483, Стеарил тартарат
ca: E483, Tartrat d'estearoïl, tartrat d'estearoil
cs: E483, Vinan stearylu
da: E483, Stearyltartrat
de: E483, Stearyltartrat, Stearoyltartrat, E 483
el: E483, Τρυγικο στεατυλιο
es: E483, Tartrato de estearilo
et: E483, Stearüültartraat
fi: E483, Stearyylitartraatti, Stearyylitartraattia
fr: E483, Tartrate de stéaryle
hu: E483, Sztearil-tartarát
it: E483, Tartrato di stearile
lt: E483, Stearilo tartratas
lv: E483, Steariltartrāts
mt: E483, Tartrat steariliku
nl: E483, Stearyltartraat
pl: E483, Winian stearylu
pt: E483, Tartarato de estearilo
ro: E483, Tartrat de stearil
sk: E483, Steary tartrát
sl: E483, Stearil tartrat
sv: E483, Stearyltartrat

en: E484, Stearyl citrate
xx: E484
af: E484, Stearielsitraat
ar: E484, ستيريل سترات
az: E484, Stearil sitrat
bg: E484, Стеарил цитрат
ca: E484, Citrat d'estearil
cs: E484, Stearyl citrát
da: E484, Stearylcitrat
de: E484, Stearylcitrat
el: E484, Κιτρικός στεατυλίου
eo: E484, Stearila citrato
es: E484, Citrato de estearilo
et: E484, Stearüültsitraat
fi: E484, Stearyylisitraatti, Stearyylisitraattia
fr: E484, Citrate de stéaryle
gl: E484, Citrato de estearilo
he: E484, סטריל ציטראט
hr: E484, Stearil citrat
hu: E484, Sztearil-citrát
id: E484, Stearil sitrat
it: E484, Stearil citrato
ja: E484, クエン酸ステアリル
ko: E484, 스테아릴 시트르산
lt: E484, Stearilo citratas
lv: E484, Stearilcitrāts
mk: E484, Стеарил цитрат
mt: E484, Ċitrat steariliku
nl: E484, Stearylcitraat
pl: E484, Cytrynian stearylowy
pt: E484, Citrato de estearilo
ro: E484, Citrat de stearil
ru: E484, Стеарил цитрат
sk: E484, Stearyl citrát
sl: E484, Stearil citrat
sq: E484, Stearil Citrat
sv: E484, Stearylcitrat
tr: E484, Stearil sitrat
uk: E484, Стеарил цитрат
zh: E484, 柠檬酸硬脂酯

en: E485, Sodium stearoyl fumarate
xx: E485
ar: E485, ستيرويل فومارات الصوديوم
bg: E485, Натриев стеароил фумарат
ca: E485, Estearoil fumarat de sodi
cs: E485, Stearoyl-fumarát sodný
da: E485, Natriumstearoylfumarat
de: E485, Natriumstearoylfumarat
el: E485, Στεαροϋλο φουμαρικό νάτριο
es: E485, Sodio estearoil fumarato
et: E485, Naatriumstearüülfumaraat
fi: E485, Natriumstearyylifumaraatti, Natriumstearyylifumaraattia
fr: E485, Fumarate de stéaroyle sodique
hu: E485, nátrium-sztearil-fumarát
it: E485, Stearoil fumarato di sodio
ja: E485, ステアロイルフマル酸ナトリウム
ko: E485, 스테아로일 푸마르산 나트륨
lt: E485, Natrio stearoilfumaratas
lv: E485, Nātrija stearoilfumarāts
nl: E485, Natriumstearoylfumaraat
pl: E485, Stearylofumaran sodu
pt: E485, Estearoil fumarato de sódio
ro: E485, Fumaratul de stearoil de sodiu, Stearoil fumarat de sodiu
ru: E485, Стеароилфумарат натрия
sk: E485, Stearoyl-fumaran sodný
sl: E485, Natrijev stearoil fumarat
sv: E485, Natriumstearoylfumarat
zh: E485, 硬脂酰富马酸钠

en: E486, Calcium stearoyl fumarate
xx: E486
af: E486, Kalsiumstearoylfumaraat
ar: E486, ستيرويل فومارات الكالسيوم
az: E486, Kalsium Stearoil Fumarat
bg: E486, Калциев стеароил фумарат
ca: E486, Estearoil fumarat de calci
cs: E486, Stearoyl-fumarát vápenatý
da: E486, Calciumstearoylfumarat
de: E486, Calciumstearoylfumarat
el: E486, Στεατοϋλο φουμαρικό ασβέστιο
es: E486, Estearoil fumarato de calcio
et: E486, Kaltsiumstearoüülfumaraat
fi: E486, Kalsiumstearyylifumaraatti, Kalsiumstearyylifumaraattia
fr: E486, Stearoylfumarate de calcium, Stearoyl fumarate de calcium
hr: E486, Kalcijev stearoil fumarat
hu: E486, Kalcium-sztearil-fumarát
it: E486, Stearoil fumarato di calcio
ja: E486, ステアロイルフマル酸カルシウム
ko: E486, 스테아로일 푸마르산 칼슘
lt: E486, Kalcio stearoilfumaratas
lv: E486, Kalcija stearoilfumarāts
mk: E486, Калциум стеароил фумарат
mt: E486, Fumarat stearojl tal-kalċju
nl: E486, Calciumstearoylfumaraat
pl: E486, Stearylofumaran wapnia
pt: E486, Estearoil fumarato de cálcio
ro: E486, Fumarat de stearoil de calciu
ru: E486, Стеароилфумарат кальция
sk: E486, Stearoylfumarát vápenatý
sl: E486, Kalcijev stearoil fumarat
sq: E486, Kalcium Stearoil Fumarat
sv: E486, Kalciumstearoylfumarat
tr: E486, Kalsiyum stearoil fumarat
uk: E486, Кальцій стеароїл фумарат
zh: E486, 硬脂酰富马酸钙

en: E487, sodium dodecyl sulfate, sodium laurilsulfate, sodium lauryl sulfate, NaDS
xx: E487
cs: E487, Dodecylsíran sodný, Sodium dodecyl sulfát, Sodiumdodecylsulfát, Sodiumlaurylsulfát, NaDS
da: E487, Natriumlaurylsulfat
de: E487, Natriumlaurylsulfat, Sodium Lauryl Sulfate, Sodium Dodecyl Sulfate, Natriumdodecylsulfat
es: E487, Dodecilsulfato sódico
fi: E487, Natriumlauryylisulfaatti, Natriumdodekyylisulfaatti, Natriumlayryylisulfaatti, Natriumlauryylisulfaattia, Natriumdodekyylisulfaattia, Natriumlayryylisulfaattia
fr: E487, Laurylsulfate de sodium, Laurylsulfate de soude, Sodium dodécylsulfate, Sodium Lauryl Sulfate, 151-21-3, C12H25NaO4S, Dodécylsulfate de sodium, Sodium lauryl sulphate, Sodium Dodecyl Sulfate
hu: E487, nátrium-lauril-szulfát
it: E487, Laurilsolfato di sodio, Lauril etossi solfato, Sodium lauryl sulfate, Sodio lauril solfato, Sodio dodecilsolfato, C12H25NaO4S
lt: E487, Natrio laurilsulfatas, C12H25SO4Na, Sodium lauryl sulfate, Natrio dodesilsulfatas
nl: E487, natriumdodecylsulfaat, Sodium lauryl sulfate, Natriumlaurylsulfaat, Natrium dodecyl sulfaat, Sodium dodecyl sulfate, 151-21-3
pl: E487, Laurylosiarczan sodu, Sól sodowa siarczanu laurylu, Dodecylosiarczan sodu
pt: E487, Dodecil sulfato de sódio, Lauril sulfato de sódio
ro: E487, Laurii sulfat de sodiu
sv: E487, Natriumdodecylsulfat, Sodium laurilsulfate, Natriumlaurylsulfat, Sodium laureth sulfate, NaDS, Sodium lauryl sulfate, Sodium dodecyl sulfate, Sodium laureth sulphate

en: E488, Ethoxylated Mono- and Di-Glycerides
xx: E488
ar: E488, مونو و دي جليسريدات إيثوكسيلية
bg: E488, Етоксилирани моно- и диглицериди
ca: E488, Monoglicèrids i diglicèrids etoxilats
cs: E488, Ethoxylované mono- a diglyceridy
da: E488, Ethoxylerede mono- og diglycerider
de: E488, Ethoxylierte Mono- und Diglyceride
el: E488, Αιθοξυλιωμένοι μονο- και διγλυκερίδιοι
es: E488, Monoglicéridos y diglicéridos etoxilados
et: E488, Etoksüülitud mono- ja diglütseriidid
fi: E488, Etoksyloidut mono- ja diglyseridit, Etoksyloituja mono- ja diglyseridejä
fr: E488, Mono- et diglycérides éthoxylés
hr: E488, Etoksilirani mono- i digliceridi
hu: E488, Etoxilezett mono- és digliceridek
it: E488, Monogliceridi e digliceridi etossilati
ja: E488, エトキシ化モノ - およびジグリセリド
ko: E488, 에톡시화 모노- 및 디글리세리드
lt: E488, Etoksilinti mono- ir digliceridai
lv: E488, Etoksilēti mono- un diglicerīdi
nl: E488, Geëthoxyleerde mono- en diglyceriden
pl: E488, Etylowane mono- i diglicerydy
pt: E488, Monoglicerídeos e diglicerídeos etoxilados
ro: E488, Mono și digliceride etoxilate, Mono- și di-gliceride etoxilate
ru: E488, Этоксилированные моно- и диглицериды
sk: E488, Etoxylované mono- a diglyceridy
sl: E488, Etoksilirani mono- in digliceridi
sv: E488, Etoxilerade mono- och diglycerider
zh: E488, 乙氧基化单甘油酯和双甘油酯

en: E489, Methyl glucoside-coconut oil ester
xx: E489
ar: E489, استر زيت جوز الهند ميثيل جلوكوزيد
az: E489, Metilqlükozid-kokos yağı esteri
bg: E489, Метил глюкозид-кокосово масло естер
ca: E489, Èster d'oli de coco de metil glucòsid
cs: E489, Ester methyl-glukosidu a kokosového oleje
da: E489, Methylglucosid-kokosolieester
de: E489, Methylglucosid-Kokosöl-Ester
el: E489, Εστέρας μεθυλογλυκοσίδης-κοκκοφοινικέλαιου
es: E489, Éster de aceite de coco de metil glucósido
et: E489, Metüülglükosiid-kookosõli ester
fi: E489, Metyyliglukosidi - kookosöljyesteri, Metyyliglukosidi - kookosöljyesteriä
fr: E489, Ester de méthylglycoside d'huile de coco
hr: E489, Ester metil glukozida i kokosovog ulja
hu: E489, Metil-glükozid-kókuszolaj-észter
it: E489, Estere di olio di cocco metil glucosidico
ja: E489, メチルグルコシド-ココナッツオイルエステル
ko: E489, 메틸 글루코사이드-코코넛 오일 에스테르
lt: E489, Metilglikozido-kokosų aliejaus esteris
lv: E489, Metilglikozīda-kokosriekstu eļļas esteris
nl: E489, Methylglucoside-kokosolie-ester
pl: E489, Ester metyloglukozydowy oleju kokosowego
pt: E489, Éster de óleo de coco de metil glucosídeo
ro: E489, Ulei de nucă de cocos și ester de metil glucozidă, Glucozidă de metil - ester de ulei de nucă de cocos
ru: E489, Метилглюкозид-кокосовое масло эфир
sk: E489, Ester metylglukozidu a kokosového oleja
sl: E489, Ester metil glukozida in kokosovega olja
sv: E489, Metylglukosid-kokosoljaester
tr: E489, Metil glukozit-hindistan cevizi yağı esteri
zh: E489, 甲基葡萄糖苷-椰子油酯

en: E490, Propylene glycol , 1\,2-propanediol, propane-1\,2-diol, 1\,2-dihydroxypropane, α-propylene glycol, methyl ethyl glycol, methylethylene glycol, Propan-1\,2-diol
xx: E490
ar: E490, بروبيلين غليكول
az: E490, Propilen qlikol
bg: E490, Пропиленгликол
ca: E490, Propilenglicol
cs: E490, Propylenglykol
da: E490, Propylenglycol
de: E490, 1\,2-Propandiol, 1\,2-Dihydroxypropan, 1\,2-Propylenglycol, (RS)-1\,2-Dihydroxypropan, E 1520, Monopropylenglycol, Monopropylenglykol, Propylenglycolum
el: E490, Προπυλενογλυκόλη
es: E490, Propilenglicol
et: E490, Propüleenglükool
fa: E490, پروپیلن گلیکول
fi: E490, Propyleeniglykoli, Propyleeniglykolia
fr: E490, Glycole de propylène, Propylène glycol
he: E490, פרופילן גליקול
hr: E490, propilen glikol
hu: E490, propilénglikol, propilén-glikol, Propán-1\,2-diol
id: E490, Propilen glikol
it: E490, Glicole propilenico
ja: E490, プロピレングリコール
ko: E490, 프로필렌 글리콜
lt: E490, Propan-1\,2-diolis
lv: E490, 1\,2-Propāndiols
mk: E490, Пропилен гликол
nl: E490, Propyleenglycol
pl: E490, Glikol propylenowy
pt: E490, Propilenoglicol
ro: E490, Propilenglicol
ru: E490, Пропиленгликоль
sk: E490, Propylénglykol
sl: E490, Propilenglikol
sq: E490, Propilen glikol
sv: E490, 1\,2-Propandiol
tr: E490, Propilen glikol
uk: E490, Пропіленгліколь
zh: E490, 丙二醇

en: E491, Sorbitan monostearate
xx: E491
bg: E491, Сорбитан моностеарат
ca: E491, Monoestearat de sorbitan
cs: E491, Sorbitanmonostearát
da: E491, Sorbitanmonostearat
de: E491, Sorbitanmonostearat, Sorbitanfettsäureester, Sorbitanester, Sorbitanstearat
el: E491, Μονοστεατικη σορβιτανη
es: E491, Monoestearato de sorbitano, monostearato de sorbitano, Sorbitan monoestearato
et: E491, Sorbitaanmonostearaat
fi: E491, Sorbitaanimonostearaatti, Sorbitaanimonostearaattia
fr: E491, Monostéarate de sorbitane
hr: E491, Sorbitanmonostearat
hu: E491, Szorbitan-monosztearát, Szorbitán-sztearát
it: E491, Monostearato di sorbitano
lt: E491, Sorbitano monostearatas
lv: E491, Sorbitāna monostearāts
mt: E491, Sorbitan monostearat
nl: E491, Sorbitaanmonostearaat
pl: E491, Monostearynian sorbitolu
pt: E491, Monoestearato de sorbitano
ro: E491, Monostearat de sorbitan, Sorbitan monostearat
sh: E491, Sorbitan monostearat
sk: E491, Sorbitanmonostearát
sl: E491, Sorbitan monostearat
sr: E491, Sorbitan monostearat
sv: E491, Sorbitanmonostearat

en: E492, Sorbitan tristearate
xx: E492
bg: E492, Сорбитан тристеарат
ca: E492, Triestearat de sorbitan
cs: E492, Sorbitantristearát
da: E492, Sorbitantristearat
de: E492, Sorbitantristearat
el: E492, Τριστεατικη σορβιτανη
es: E492, Triestearato de sorbitano, Sorbitan triestearato
et: E492, Sorbitaantristearaat, Heleda
fi: E492, Sorbitaanitristearaatti, Sorbitaanitristearaattia
fr: E492, Tristéarate de sorbitane, Perles ou paillettes claires, de couleur crème à ocre, ou solide dur
hr: E492, sorbitan tristearat
hu: E492, Szorbitan-trisztearát
it: E492, Tristearato di sorbitano
lt: E492, Sorbitano tristearatas, Nuo šviesios
lv: E492, Sorbitāna tristearāts
mt: E492, Sorbitan tristearat
nl: E492, Sorbitaantristearaat
pl: E492, Tristearynian sorbitolu
pt: E492, Triestearato de sorbitano
ro: E492, Tristearat de sorbitan
ru: E492, сорбитан-тристеарат, сорбитан тристеарат
sk: E492, Sorbitantristearát
sl: E492, Sorbitan tristearat
sv: E492, Sorbitantristearat, Sorbitan tristearat

en: E493, Sorbitan monolaurate
xx: E493
bg: E493, Сорбитан монолауарат
ca: E493, Monolaurat de sorbitan
cs: E493, Sorbitanmonolaurát
da: E493, Sorbitanmonolaurat
de: E493, Sorbitanmonolaurat
el: E493, Μονολαυρικη σορβιτανη
es: E493, Monolaurato de sorbitano
et: E493, Sorbitaanmonolauraat
fi: E493, Sorbitaanimonolauraatti, Sorbitaanimonolauraattia
fr: E493, Monolaurate de sorbitane
hu: E493, Szorbitan-monolaurát
it: E493, Monolaurato di sorbitano
lt: E493, Sorbitano monolauratas
lv: E493, Sorbitāna monolaurāts
mt: E493, Monolawrat tas-sorbitan
nl: E493, Sorbitaanmonolauraat
pl: E493, Monolaurynian sorbitolu
pt: E493, Monolaurato de sorbitano
ro: E493, Monolaurat de sorbitan
sk: E493, Sorbitanmonolaurát
sl: E493, Sorbitan monolaurat
sv: E493, Sorbitanmonolaurat

en: E494, Sorbitan monooleate
xx: E494
bg: E494, Сорбитан моноолеат
ca: E494, Monooleat de sorbitan
cs: E494, Sorbitanmonooleát
da: E494, Sorbitanmonooleat
de: E494, Sorbitanmonooleat
el: E494, Μονοελαϊκη σορβιτανη
es: E494, Sorbitan monooleate, Sorbitan monooleato
et: E494, Sorbitaanmonoleaat
fi: E494, Sorbitaanimono-oleaatti, Sorbitaanimono-oleaattia
fr: E494, Monoléate de sorbitane, Monoléate de sorbitan
hu: E494, Szorbitan-monooleát
it: E494, Monooleato di sorbitano
lt: E494, Sorbitano monoleatas
lv: E494, Sorbitāna monooleāts
mt: E494, Monooleat tas-sorbitan
nl: E494, Sorbitaanmonoöleaat
pl: E494, Monooleinian sorbitolu
pt: E494, Mono-oleato de sorbitano
ro: E494, Monooleat de sorbitan
sk: E494, Sorbitanmonooleát
sl: E494, Sorbitan monooleat
sv: E494, Sorbitanmonooleat

en: E495, Sorbitan monopalmitate
xx: E495
bg: E495, Сорбитан монопалмитат
ca: E495, Monopalmitat de sorbitan
cs: E495, Sorbitanmonopalmitát
da: E495, Sorbitanmonopalmitat
de: E495, Sorbitanmonopalmitat
el: E495, Μονοπαλμιτικη σορβιτανη
es: E495, Monopalmitato de sorbitano, Sorbitan monopalmitato
et: E495, Sorbitaanmonopalmitaat
fi: E495, Sorbitaanimonopalmitaatti, Sorbitaanimonopalmitaattia
fr: E495, Monopalmitate de sorbitane
hu: E495, Szorbitan-monopalmitát
it: E495, Monopalmitato di sorbitano
lt: E495, Sorbitano monopalmitatas
lv: E495, Sorbitāna monopalmitāts
mt: E495, Monopalmitat tas-sorbitan
nl: E495, Sorbitaanmonopalmitaat
pl: E495, Monopalmitynian sorbitolu
pt: E495, Monopalmitato de sorbitano
ro: E495, Monopalmitat de sorbitan
sk: E495, Sorbitanmonopalmitát
sl: E495, Sorbitan monopalmitat
sv: E495, Sorbitanmonopalmitat

en: E496, Sorbitan trioleate
xx: E496
ar: E496, ثلاثي الأوليات سوربيتان
bg: E496, Сорбитан триолеат
ca: E496, Trioleat de sorbità
cs: E496, Sorbitan trioleát
da: E496, Sorbitantrioleat
de: E496, Sorbitantrioleat
el: E496, Τριολεϊκός σορβιτάνης
es: E496, Trioleato de sorbitano
et: E496, Sorbitantrioleaat
fi: E496, Sorbitaanitrioleaatti, Sorbitaanitrioleaattia
fr: E496, Trioléate de sorbitane
hu: E496, Szorbitan-trioleát
it: E496, Trioleato di sorbitano
ja: E496, トリオレイン酸ソルビタン
ko: E496, 소르비탄 트라이올리에이트
lt: E496, Sorbitano trioleatas
lv: E496, Sorbitāna trioleāts
nl: E496, Sorbitantrioleaat
pl: E496, Trioleinian sorbitanu
pt: E496, Trioleato de sorbitano
ro: E496, Sorbitan trioleat
ru: E496, Сорбитан триолеат
sk: E496, Sorbitan trioleát
sl: E496, Sorbitan trioleat
sv: E496, Sorbitantrioleat
zh: E496, 脱水山梨醇三油酸酯